Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.330

Seizure and forfeiture—Distribution of proceeds.

(1) The proceeds of any forfeiture action brought under RCW 7.68.320 shall be distributed as follows:

(a) First, to the victim or to the plaintiff in a wrongful death action brought as a result of the victim's death, to satisfy any money judgment against the convicted person, or to satisfy any restitution ordered as part of the convicted person's sentence;

(b) Second, to the reasonable legal expenses of bringing the action;

(c) Third, to the crime victims' compensation fund under RCW 7.68.090.

(2) A court may establish such escrow accounts or other arrangements as it deems necessary and appropriate in order to distribute proceeds in accordance with this section.

[ 1993 c 288 s 6.]